Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 29 Protection of Livestock Animals

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 100, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Cross references. —

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 20 to 40, 142 to 168.

Liability for injury to trespassing animals and bees as result of spraying or dusting of crop, 37 ALR2d 833.

Constitutionality of statute providing for destruction of dog as affected by property rights in dog, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Law as to cats; injuries to cats, 73 ALR2d 1032, 55 ALR4th 1080.

Police power with respect to cats, 73 ALR2d 1032.

What constitutes statutory offense of cruelty to animals, 82 ALR2d 794.

Liability for injury to animals poisoned as result of spraying or dusting of crop, 37 ALR3d 833.

Measure, elements, and amount of damages for killing or injuring cat, 8 ALR4th 1287.

Applicability of state animal cruelty statute to medical or scientific experimentation employing animals, 42 ALR4th 860.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, of livestock or fowl on highway, 55 ALR4th 822.

What constitutes offense of cruelty to animals—modern cases, 6 ALR5th 733.

Liability for statement or publication charging plaintiff with killing of, cruelty to, or inhumane treatment of animals, 69 ALR5th 645.

Construction and application of Horse Protection Act of 1970 (15 USC §§ 1821 et seq.),
131 ALR Fed 363.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 105 to 119; 3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 99 to 116, 159 to 162, 274 to 332.

§ 11-29-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 100, § 3.

“Owner” or “person” means any individual including the agents and employees of corporations;

“Torture” or “cruelty” means every act, omission or neglect whereby the willful and malicious infliction of pain or suffering is caused, permitted or allowed to continue when there is a reasonable remedy or relief;

“Disposal” means as defined in W.S. 11-24-101(a)(iv);

“Livestock” means as defined in W.S. 23-1-102(a)(xvi);

“Livestock animal” means:

Any bovine, including domestic bison, equine, swine, sheep, goat, domesticated camelid animal, ratite bird, rabbit or poultry; or

Any animal used or harvested for any good and proper purpose including but not limited to food, fiber, fur, leather, medical research and byproducts; or

Any animal used or trained for work, sport, exhibit or entertainment.

A “person with authority to enforce this chapter” means a peace officer, agent or officer of the board;

“Reasonable costs of impoundment” means all costs incurred by the impounding entity in providing necessary food and water, veterinary attention and treatment for any animal which is impounded under this act;

“This act” means W.S.

11-29-101

through

11-29-115

.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 2287; C.S. 1910, § 3099; C.S. 1920, § 3860; R.S. 1931, § 6-114; C.S. 1945, § 56-2014; W.S. 1957, § 11-545; Laws 1965, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2011, ch. 100, §§ 2, 3; 2021 ch. 119, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added present (a)(iv) and (a)(v), and redesignated former (a)(iv) as (a)(vi).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(i), which read: “ ‘Animal’ means every living dumb creature”; in (a)(iii), deleted “ ‘torment’ “ after “ ‘Torture’ “; added (a)(vi); redesignated former (a)(vi) as (a)(vii); and substituted “11-29-115” for “11-29-113” in (a)(vii).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(vii) and (a)(viii); and redesignated former (a)(vii) as (a)(ix).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated

in

Wyoming Humane Soc'y v. Port, 404 P.2d 834,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 11-29-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982,
ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 1, related to cruelty to animals generally. For present similar provisions, see §

6-3-203

.

§ 11-29-103.
Livestock
animals to be fed while confined; ownership; penalties.

Every person who confines or causes to be confined any livestock animal under the laws of this state, shall supply to the livestock animal during confinement a sufficient quantity of wholesome food and water.

A livestock animal is the private property of its owner.

A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both except that a subsequent offense is a high misdemeanor punishable by not more than one (1) year imprisonment, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2275; C.S. 1910, § 3087; C.S. 1920, § 3848; R.S. 1931, § 6-102; C.S. 1945, § 56-2002; W.S. 1957, § 11-547; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2011, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to impounding estrays generally, see §§

11-24-101

to

11-24-115

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), made stylistic changes, added “livestock,” and deleted “in any pound or corral” before “under the laws”; added (b); redesignated former (b) as (c); and rewrote (c) providing an increased penalty for repeat offenses, and made stylistic changes.

§ 11-29-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 100, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 3, related to furnishing food to impounded animals.

Laws 2011, ch. 100, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 11-29-105.
Livestock board; certificates or badges to be provided.

Officers and agents of
the Wyoming livestock board shall be provided with a certificate by
the board that they are officers and agents of the board, in such
form as the board may choose, or with a badge bearing the name or
seal of the board, and if requested, shall show the certificate or
badge when acting officially.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 2285; C.S. 1910, § 3097; C.S. 1920, § 3858; R.S. 1931, § 6-112; C.S. 1945, § 56-2012; W.S. 1957, § 11-550; Laws 1965, ch. 185, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-29-106.
Livestock
board; authority to prevent cruelty; penalty for interference with
officer.

Any peace officer, agent
or officer of the board may lawfully interfere to prevent the perpetration
of any act of cruelty upon any livestock animal in his presence. Any
person who interferes with, obstructs or resists any peace officer
or officer or agent of the board in the discharge of his duty shall
be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than
one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00), or imprisoned not more
than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 2279; C.S. 1910, § 3091; C.S. 1920, § 3852; R.S. 1931, § 6-106; C.S. 1945, § 56-2006; W.S. 1957, § 11-551; Laws 1965, ch. 185, § 4; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2006, ch. 88, § 2; 2011, ch. 100, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “peace officer, agent or officer” for “officer or agent,” and substituted “officer or officer or agent of the board” for “officer or agent.”

Laws 2006 ch. 88, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “livestock.”

Stated

in

Wyoming Humane Soc'y v. Port, 404 P.2d 834,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Eisenbarth v. Hartford Fire Ins. Co., 840 P.2d 945,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 11-29-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006,
ch. 88, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 13, pertained to the livestock board and its authority to require arrests and costs.

Stated

in

Wyoming Humane Soc'y v. Port, 404 P.2d 834,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 11-29-108.
Livestock board; seized livestock animals and vehicles; lien on seized chattels; civil action for unpaid expenses.

When any person arrested under this act is in charge of any vehicle drawn by or containing any livestock animal cruelly treated in violation of W.S.

6-3-1002

or this chapter at the time of arrest, any peace officer, agent or officer of the board may take charge of the livestock animal and vehicle and its contents, and give notice thereof to the owner, if known, and shall provide for them until their owner takes possession of them. The board or local government shall have a lien on the livestock animals, the vehicle and its contents for the reasonable costs of impoundment. The expense or any part remaining unpaid may be recovered by the board or local government in a civil action.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 2280; C.S. 1910, § 3092; C.S. 1920, § 3853; R.S. 1931, § 6-107; C.S. 1945, § 56-2007; W.S. 1957, § 11-553; Laws 1965, ch. 185, § 6; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1996, ch. 55, § 1; 2011, ch. 100, § 2; 2021 ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 119, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “livestock” throughout, and added “as defined in W.S.

6-3-203

.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "in violation of W.S.

6-3-1002

or this chapter" for "as defined in W.S.

6-3-203

" in the first sentence.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 119, § 4, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "reasonable costs of impoundment" for "expense of the care and provision" in the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-29-101(a)(iv).

§ 11-29-109.
Livestock board; care of abandoned livestock animals; civil action for expenses; lien.

Any peace officer, agent or officer of the board may take charge of any livestock animal found abandoned, neglected or treated with cruelty in violation of W.S.

6-3-1002

or this chapter. He shall give notice to the owner, if known, and may care and provide for the livestock animal until the livestock animal is disposed of. The reasonable costs of impoundment are a charge against the owner of the livestock animal and collectible from the owner by the board or by the local government employing the peace officer taking charge of the livestock animal in a civil action. The board or local government may detain the livestock animals until the reasonable costs of impoundment are paid and shall have a lien upon the livestock animals therefor. This lien shall be filed as provided pursuant to W.S.

29-7-101

through

29-7-106

.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 2281; C.S. 1910, § 3093; C.S. 1920, § 3854; R.S. 1931, § 6-108; C.S. 1945, § 56-2008; W.S. 1957, § 11-554; Laws 1965, ch. 185, § 7; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-110

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1996, ch. 55, § 1; 2011, ch. 100, § 2; 2021 ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 119, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “livestock” throughout, added “as defined in W.S.

6-3-203

,” deleted “owner takes charge of the” after “animal until the,” added “is released or destroyed,” and added the present last sentence.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence, deleted "cruelly" following "neglected or," added "with cruelty" and substituted "in violation of W.S.

6-3-1002

or this chapter" for "as defined in W.S.

6-3-203

."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 119, § 4, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "disposed of" for "released or destroyed" in the second sentence, "reasonable costs of impoundment are" for "expenses of care and provision is" in the third sentence, and "reasonable costs of impoundment are" for "expense for food, shelter and care is" in the fourth sentence.

§ 11-29-110.
Livestock
board; enforcement of liens; notice to owner.

Any person entitled to
a lien under this act may enforce the lien by disposing of the livestock
animals and other personal property upon which the lien is given,
at public auction, upon giving written notice to the owner, if he
is known, of the time and place of the disposal, at least five (5)
days previous thereto, and by posting three (3) notices of the time
and place of the disposal in three (3) public places within the county
at least five (5) days previous thereto. If the owner is not known,
the notice shall be posted at least ten (10) days previous to the
disposal.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 2284; C.S. 1910, § 3096; C.S. 1920, § 3857; R.S. 1931, § 6-111; C.S. 1945, § 56-2011; W.S. 1957, § 11-556; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-111

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2010, ch. 80, § 1; 2011, ch. 100, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “disposing of” for “selling,” and subsituted “disposal” for “sale.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added “livestock.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-29-101(a)(vii).

§ 11-29-111.
Livestock
board; destruction of diseased or injured livestock animals.

Any peace officer, agent
or officer of the board may destroy or cause to be destroyed any livestock
animal in his charge when in his judgment and the judgment of a Wyoming
licensed veterinarian or the judgment of the livestock animal owner,
the livestock animal appears to be severely injured, severely disabled,
diseased past recovery or unfit for any useful purpose. There shall
be no right for any future indemnity or payment to the owner for the
destruction of any livestock animal destroyed and the peace officer,
agent or officer of the board shall be held harmless while acting
in accordance with this section.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 2283; C.S. 1910, § 3095; C.S. 1920, § 3856; R.S. 1931, § 6-110; C.S. 1945, § 56-2010; W.S. 1957, § 11-557; Laws 1965, ch. 185, § 9; W.S. 1977, §

11-34-112

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2011, ch. 100, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read: “Any agent or officer of the board may destroy or cause to be destroyed any animal in his charge when in his judgment and by the written certificate of two (2) reputable citizens called to view the animal in his presence, one (1) of whom may be selected by the owner of the animal if he so requests, the animal appears to be injured, disabled, diseased past recovery or unfit for any useful purpose”, and added the present second sentence.

§ 11-29-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982,
ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 4, related to penalties for keeping fighting fowls or animals. For present similar provisions, see §

6-3-203

.

§ 11-29-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 100, § 3.

Editor's notes. –

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 31, § 17, related to dehorning cattle.

Laws 2011, ch. 100, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 15, ch. 31, Laws 1895, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 11-29-114.
Impoundment of livestock animals; cost of care for livestock animals; providing for bond, forfeiture hearing.

Any person with authority to enforce this chapter who has probable cause to believe there has been a violation of this chapter may, in consultation with an agent or officer of the board, impound any livestock animal treated cruelly as determined by a Wyoming licensed veterinarian or veterinarian employed by the board.

If any livestock animal is impounded under subsection (a) of this section, the following shall apply:

Within the earlier of seventy-two (72) hours of impoundment or charges being filed, the circuit court shall hold a hearing to set a bond in an amount the circuit court determines is sufficient to provide for the livestock animal's reasonable costs of impoundment for at least ninety (90) days including the day on which the livestock animal was impounded. At the request of the owner of the livestock animal, the court may make a determination on the disposition of the livestock animal at a hearing pursuant to this paragraph;

The bond shall be posted by the owner of the livestock animal with the circuit court in the county where the livestock animal was impounded within ten (10) days after the hearing required by this paragraph.

When the bond required by subsection (b) of this section expires, if the owner of the livestock animal desires to prevent disposition of the livestock animal by the person with authority to enforce this chapter, the owner shall post a new bond with the court as described in subsection (b) of this section. The court may correct, alter or otherwise adjust the new bond before the expiration date of the previous bond.

If a bond is not posted under subsection (b) or (c) of this section, the person with authority to enforce this chapter shall dispose of the livestock animal. As used in this section, “dispose” means as defined in W.S. 11-24-101(a)(iv), and shall also mean to place for adoption or return to the owner. The owner of the livestock animal shall be liable for all costs associated with the final disposition of the livestock animal under this subsection. Posting of a bond shall not prevent the person with authority to enforce this chapter from disposing of the impounded livestock animal before the expiration of the period covered by the bond if during a disposition hearing pursuant to subsection (g) of this section the court orders the forfeiture of the livestock animal to a person with authority to enforce this chapter or the owner voluntarily forfeits the livestock animal. No animal shall be forfeited without a hearing pursuant to subsections (g) through (j) of this section, regardless of whether a bond is posted, if the animal is connected to the livelihood or ability to make a living of the owner.

If a bond has been posted in accordance with subsection (b) or (c) of this section, the person with authority to enforce this chapter, may draw from the bond the actual costs as described in subsection (b) of this section, from the date of initial impoundment to the date of final disposition of the livestock animal.

Upon the final disposition of the livestock animal, any bond amount remaining that has not been expended in the impoundment and disposition of the livestock animal shall be remitted to the owner of the livestock animal.

A person with authority to enforce this chapter or other participant in the criminal action, may file a petition in the criminal action requesting that the court issue an order providing for the final disposition of the livestock animal if:

The livestock animal is in the possession of and being held by a person with authority to enforce this chapter;

The outcome of the criminal action charging a violation of this chapter is pending; and

The final disposition of the livestock animal has not occurred.

Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, the court shall set a hearing on the petition for disposition of the livestock animal. The hearing shall be conducted within seven (7) days after the filing of the petition or as soon as practicable thereafter. The hearing shall be limited to the question of the disposition of the livestock animal.

At a hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, the prosecutor shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the livestock animal was subjected to a violation of this chapter. After the hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the livestock animal was subjected to a violation of this chapter, the court may order immediate forfeiture of the livestock animal to the person with authority to enforce this chapter. If, after the hearing, the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the livestock animal was not subjected to a violation of this chapter, the livestock animal shall be returned to the owner of the livestock animal and the owner shall not be responsible for any reasonable costs of the impoundment incurred after a finding that the livestock animal was not subjected to a violation of this chapter unless the person later pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of this chapter.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 88, § 1; 2011, ch. 100, § 2; 2021 ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 119, §§ 2, 5, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to cruelty to animals and penalties generally, see §

6-3-203

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, In (a) through (e), added “livestock”; in (a), added “Wyoming”; and in (d), substituted “dispose of the livestock animal as defined in W.S. 11-24-101(a)(iv)” for “determine final disposition of the animal in accordance with reasonable practices for the humane treatment of animals.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "6-3-1002,

6-3-1003

or

6-3-1005

" for "6-3-203" in (b).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 119, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), substituted "person with authority to enforce this chapter who has probable cause to believe there has been a violation of this chapter" for "peace officer, agent or officer of the board," ", in consultation with an agent or officer of the board, impound" for "take possession of"; in the first sentence of (c), added "required by subsection (b) of this section," substituted "person with authority to enforce this chapter" for "board," added the second sentence; rewrote (d), which read, "If a bond is not posted under subsection (b) or (c) of this section, the board shall dispose of the livestock animal as defined in W.S. 11-24-101(a)(iv). The owner of the livestock animal shall be liable for all costs associated with the final disposition of the livestock animal under this subsection"; substituted "person with authority to enforce this chapter" for "agency employing the officer, or the board" in (e); and added (f) through (j).

The third 2021 amendment, by ch. 119, § 5, rewrote (b), which read, "The owner of the livestock animal impounded under subsection (a) of this section, and who has been cited under W.S.

6-3-1002

,

6-3-1003

or

6-3-1005

, shall be required to post a bond with the circuit court in the county where the livestock animal was impounded.
The bond shall be: (i) In an amount the circuit court determines is sufficient to provide for the livestock animal’s board, nutritional care, veterinary care and diagnostic testing for at least ninety (90) days including the day on which the livestock animal was impounded; and (ii) Filed with the circuit court within ten (10) days after the livestock animal is impounded."

Laws 2021, ch. 119, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 88, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 11-29-115.
Use
of agricultural and livestock management practices.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits:

The use of Wyoming industry accepted agricultural or livestock management practices or any other commonly practiced animal husbandry procedure used on livestock animals, as defined by W.S. 11-29-101(a)(vi);

A Wyoming licensed veterinarian from treating a livestock animal as authorized by the Wyoming Veterinary Medical Practice Act;

Any rodeo event employing animal care practices generally accepted within the rodeo industry, whether the event is performed in a rodeo, jackpot or similar arena;

A person from humanely destroying a livestock animal.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 100, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 100, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.